Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,118
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the number of leaking underground storage tanks throughout the state is increasing and that there exists a serious threat to the health and safety of citizens because substances contained in leaking storage tanks are often potential ground water contaminants and major fire and explosive hazards.

For the reasons stated in this section, the Legislature deems it necessary to provide a program of storage tank registration and inspection as a preventative measure and a comprehensive leak cleanup program as a responsive measure. Primary responsibility for the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act shall be with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. However, preventative measures described in such act shall also be carried out by the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal's actions shall be pursuant to an interagency agreement with the department.

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 57;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 116;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 409.